cs: Textura těstovinové omáčky: S velkými kousky; Krémová; Pyré; Hladká; S kousky; Ostatní
it: Consistenza del sugo per la pasta: A pezzettoni; Cremoso; Passato; Vellutato; Con pezzi; Altro
pt-BR: Textura do molho para massa: Em pedaços; Cremoso; Em purê; Liso; Com pedaços; Outro
hu: Tésztaszósz textúrája: Darabos; Krémes; Pürésített; Sima; Darabokkal; Egyéb
fi: Pastakastikkeen koostumus: Karkea; Kermainen; Soseutettu; Sileä; Paloja sisältävä; Muu
sl-SI: Tekstura omake za testenine: S koščki; Kremasta; Pasirana; Gladka; S kosi; Drugo
fr: Texture de la sauce pour pâtes: Épaisse; Crémeuse; En purée; Lisse; Avec morceaux; Autre
de: Konsistenz der Pastasauce: Stückig; Cremig; Püriert; Glatt; Mit Stücken; Sonstige
sk-SK: Konzistencia omáčky na cestoviny: Hrubá textúra; Krémová; Rozmixovaná; Jemná; S kúskami; Iné
sv: Konsistens på pastasås: Grov; Krämig; Passerad; Slät; Med bitar; Övrigt
nl: Pastasaus textuur: Grof; Romig; Gepureerd; Glad; Met stukjes; Overig
lt-LT: Makaronų padažo tekstūra: Su gabaliukais; Kreminis; Trintas; Vientisas; Su gabaliukais; Kita
ro-RO: Textura sosului de paste: Cu bucăți; Cremoasă; Pasată; Fină; Cu bucăți; Altele
ko: 파스타 소스 질감: 덩어리가 있는; 크리미; 퓌레; 부드러운; 조각이 있는; 기타
th: เนื้อสัมผัสของซอสพาสต้า: เนื้อหยาบ; เนื้อครีม; เนื้อบดละเอียด; เนื้อเนียน; มีชิ้นส่วนผสม; อื่นๆ
da: Pastasaucens tekstur: Grov; Cremet; Puré; Jævn; Med stykker; Andet
pt-PT: textura do molho de massa: Com pedaços grandes; Cremoso; Em puré; Suave; Com pedaços; Outra
vi: Độ đặc của nước sốt mì ống: Có miếng nhỏ; Dạng kem; Xay nhuyễn; Mịn; Có các miếng nhỏ; Khác
en: Pasta sauce texture: Chunky; Creamy; Pureed; Smooth; With pieces; Other
el: Υφή σάλτσας ζυμαρικών: Με μεγάλα κομμάτια; Κρεμώδης; Πολτοποιημένη; Λεία; Με κομμάτια; Άλλο
pl: Tekstura sosu do makaronu: Z kawałkami; Kremowa; Przetarta (purée); Gładka; Z kawałkami; Inne
hr-HR: Tekstura umaka za tjesteninu: S komadićima; Kremasto; Pasirano; Glatko; S komadima; Ostalo
ja: パスタソースの質感: チャンキー; クリーミー; ピューレ状; なめらか; 具材入り; その他
es: Textura de salsa para pasta: Gruesa; Cremosa; En puré; Suave; Con trozos; Otra
zh-TW: 義大利麵醬質地: 塊狀; 濃滑; 泥狀; 滑順; 含顆粒; 其他
bg-BG: Текстура на сос за паста: Едра; Кремообразна; Пюрирана; Гладка; С парченца; Друго
ru: Текстура соуса для пасты: С крупными кусочками; Кремовая; Пюреобразная; Однородная; С кусочками; Другое
nb: Konsistens på pastasaus: Grov; Kremet; Purert; Glatt; Med biter; Annet
zh-CN: 意面酱质地: 块状; 奶油质地; 泥状; 顺滑; 带有碎块; 其他
tr: Makarna sosu dokusu: Taneli; Kremamsı; Püre; Pürüzsüz; Parçacıklı; Diğer